Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-232
Act; how construed.

The Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act shall not be construed to limit the remedies available to consumers, the Attorney General, or any county attorney under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act or any other state or federal law.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2011;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 94.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.